Maryland, session 2025, HB0431.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xliv) Title 14, Subtitle 49 of this article; [or]
(xlv) Section 12–6C–09.1 of the Health Occupations Article; or

HOUSE BILL 431 3
(XLVI) SECTION 5–428 OF THE COURTS ARTICLE; OR
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
5–428. 14–1328.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “CONSUMER CONTRACT” MEANS A CONTRACT
INVOLVING THE SALE, LEASE, OR PROVISION OF GOODS OR SERVICES THAT ARE FOR
PERSONAL, FAMILY, OR HOUSEHOLD PURPOSES.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(1) ANY CONSUMER CONTRACT PROVIDED BY A BUSINESS, INCLUDING
AN AFFILIATE OR A SUBSIDIARY OF THE BUSINESS, THAT IS DOING BUSINESS UNDER
A LICENSE, FRANCHISE AGREEMENT, CERTIFICATE, OR OTHER AUTHORIZATION
ISSUED BY A STATE AGENCY, POLITICAL SUBDIVISION, OR PUBLIC UTILITY
COMMISSION;
(2) A SERVICE REGULATED BY:
(I) THE MARYLAND PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION;
(II) THE FEDERAL COMMUNICATIONS COMMISSION; OR
(III) THE FEDERAL ENERGY REGULATORY COMMISSION; OR
(3) A PERSON OR BUSINESS LICENSED TO PROVIDE SECURITY SYSTEM
SERVICES UNDER TITLE 18 OF THE BUSINESS OCCUPATIONS AND PROFESSIONS
ARTICLE.
(C) ANY A PROVISION IN A CONSUMER CONTRACT THAT SETS A SHORTER
PERIOD OF TIME TO BRING AN ACTION UNDER OR ON THE CONSUMER CONTRACT
THAN REQUIRED UNDER BY THE LAW OF THE STATE AT THE TIME WHEN THE
CONSUMER CONTRACT IS ISSUED OR DELIVERED IS AGAINST STATE PUBLIC POLICY,
ILLEGAL, AND VOID.
(C) (D) IF A CONSUMER CONTRACT CONTAINS A PROVISION THAT IS
ILLEGAL UNDER THIS SECTION:
(1) A COURT MAY NOT GIVE EFFECT TO THE PROVISION; AND
(2) A DEFENSE TO LIABILITY UNDER THE CONSUMER CONTRACT MAY
NOT BE BASED ON THE SHORTER LIMITATION PERIOD.

HOUSE BILL 431
(D) A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE, EXCEPT § 13–411 OF
THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any contract entered into before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025 June 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.